Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 24
FUELS TAX

Sec.

§ 63-2401. Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Aircraft engine fuel” means:

Aviation gasoline, defined as any mixture of volatile hydrocarbons used in aircraft reciprocating engines; and

Jet fuel, defined as any mixture of volatile hydrocarbons used in aircraft turbojet and turboprop engines.

“Biodiesel” means any fuel that is derived in whole or in part from agricultural products or animal fats or the wastes of such products and is suitable for use as fuel in diesel engines.

“Biodiesel blend” means any fuel produced by blending biodiesel with petroleum-based diesel to produce a fuel suitable for use in diesel engines.

“Bond” means:

A surety bond, in an amount required by this chapter, duly executed by a surety company licensed and authorized to do business in this state conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes, penalties and other obligations arising out of the provisions of this chapter; or

A deposit with the commission by any person required to be licensed pursuant to this chapter under terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe, of a like amount of lawful money of the United States or bonds or other obligations of the United States, the state of Idaho, or any county of the state; or

An irrevocable letter of credit issued to the commission by a bank doing business in this state payable to the state upon failure of the person on whose behalf it is issued to remit any payment due under the provisions of this chapter.

“Commercial motor boat” means any boat, equipped with a motor, which is wholly or partly used in a profit-making enterprise or in an enterprise conducted with the intent of making a profit.

“Commission” means the state tax commission of the state of Idaho.

“Distributor” means any person who receives motor fuel in this state and includes a special fuels dealer. Any person who sells or receives gaseous special fuels will not be considered a distributor unless:

The gaseous special fuel is delivered into the fuel supply tank or tanks of a motor vehicle not then owned or controlled by him; or

The gaseous special fuel is placed in certain gaseous special fuels bulk tanks upon which the seller may charge tax as the result of an agreement with the customer.

“Dyed fuel” means diesel fuel that is dyed pursuant to requirements of the internal revenue service, or the environmental protection agency.

“Exported” means delivered by truck or rail across the boundaries of this state by or for the seller or purchaser from a place of origin in this state.

“Gasohol” means gasoline blended with ten percent (10%) or more of anhydrous ethanol.

“Gasoline” means any mixture of volatile hydrocarbons suitable as a fuel for the propulsion of motor vehicles or motor boats. “Gasoline” also means aircraft engine fuels when used for the operation or propulsion of motor vehicles or motor boats and includes gasohol, but does not include special fuels.
(12) “Highways” means every place of whatever nature open to the use of the public as a matter of right for the purpose of vehicular travel which is maintained by the state of Idaho or an agency or taxing subdivision or unit thereof or the federal government or an agency or instrumentality thereof. Provided, however, if the cost of maintaining a roadway is primarily borne by a special fuels user who operates motor vehicles on that roadway pursuant to a written contract during any period of time that a special fuels tax liability accrues to the user, such a roadway shall not be considered a “highway” for any purpose related to calculating that user’s special fuels’ tax liability or refund.

All fuel suitable as fuel for diesel engines;

A compressed or liquefied gas obtained as a by-product in petroleum refining or natural gasoline manufacture, such as butane, isobutane, propane, propylene, butylenes, and their mixtures; and
(c) Natural gas, either liquid or gas, and hydrogen, used for the generation of power for the operation or propulsion of motor vehicles.

(13) “Idling” means the period of time greater than twenty-five hundredths (.25) of an hour when a motor vehicle is stationary with the engine operating at less than one thousand two hundred (1,200) revolutions per minute (RPM), without the power take-off (PTO) unit engaged, with the transmission in the neutral or park position, and with the parking brake set.

(14) “Imported” means delivered by truck or rail across the boundaries of this state by or for the seller or purchaser from a place of origin outside this state.

(15) “International fuel tax agreement” and “IFTA” mean the international fuel tax agreement required by the intermodal surface transportation efficiency act of 1991, Public Law 102-240, 105 Stat. 1914, and referred to in 49 U.S.C. 31701, including subsequent amendments to that agreement.

(16) “Jurisdiction” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, a province or territory of Canada, or a state, territory or agency of Mexico in the event that the state, territory or agency participates in the international fuel tax agreement.

(17) “Licensed motor fuel distributor” means any distributor who has obtained a license under the provisions of section 63-2427A, Idaho Code.

(18) “Motor fuel” means gasoline, ethanol, ethanol blended fuel, gasoline blend stocks, natural gasoline, special fuels, aircraft engine fuels or any other fuels suitable for the operation or propulsion of motor vehicles, motor boats or aircraft.

(19) “Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle designed for operation, or required to be licensed for operation, upon a highway.

(20) “Person” means any individual, firm, fiduciary, copartnership, association, limited liability company, corporation, governmental instrumentality including the state and all of its agencies and political subdivisions, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number, unless the intent to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context. Whenever used in any clause prescribing and imposing a fine or imprisonment, or both, the term “person” as applied to an association means the partners or members, and as applied to corporations, the officers.

(21) “Recreational vehicle” means a snowmobile as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code; a motor driven cycle or motorcycle as defined in section 49-114, Idaho Code; any recreational vehicle as defined in section 49-119, Idaho Code; and an all-terrain vehicle as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.

(22) “Retail dealer” means any person engaged in the retail sale of motor fuels to the public or for use in the state.

(23) “Special fuels” means:

(24) “Special fuels dealer” means “distributor” under subsection (7) of this section.

(25) “Special fuels user” means any person who uses or consumes special fuels for the operation or propulsion of motor vehicles owned or controlled by him upon the highways of this state.

(26) “Use” means either:

(a) The receipt, delivery or placing of fuels by a licensed distributor or a special fuels dealer into the fuel supply tank or tanks of any motor vehicle not owned or controlled by him while the vehicle is within this state; or

(b) The consumption of fuels in the operation or propulsion of a motor vehicle on the highways of this state.

§ 63-2402. Imposition of tax upon motor fuel.

A tax is hereby imposed upon the distributor who receives motor fuel in this state. The legal incidence of the tax imposed under this section is borne by the distributor. The tax becomes due and payable upon receipt of the motor fuel in this state by the distributor unless such tax liability has previously accrued to another distributor pursuant to this section. The tax shall be imposed without regard to whether use is on a governmental basis or otherwise, unless exempted by this chapter.

The tax imposed in this section shall be at the rate of thirty-two cents (32¢) per gallon of motor fuel received. This tax shall be subject to the exemptions, deductions and refunds set forth in this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the distributor who is liable for payment of the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section from including as part of the selling price an amount equal to such tax on motor fuels sold or delivered by such distributor; provided however, that nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to impose tax liability on any person to whom such fuel is sold or delivered except as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

Any person coming into this state in a motor vehicle may transport in the manufacturer’s original tank of that vehicle, for his own use only, not more than thirty (30) gallons of motor fuel for the purpose of operating that motor vehicle, without complying with the provisions of this chapter.

The tax imposed in this section does not apply to:

Special fuels that have been dyed at a refinery or terminal under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. section 4082 and regulations adopted thereunder, or under the clean air act and regulations adopted thereunder; or

Special fuels that are gaseous special fuels, as defined in section 63-2424, Idaho Code, except that part thereof that is delivered into the fuel supply tank or tanks of a motor vehicle or certain gaseous special fuels bulk tanks. Upon agreement with the customer, the licensed distributor may charge tax when placing gaseous special fuels into the customer’s bulk tanks; or

Aircraft engine fuel subject to tax under section 63-2408, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2403. Receipt of motor fuel — Determination.

Motor fuel is received as follows:

Motor fuel produced, refined, manufactured, blended or compounded by any person or stored at a pipeline terminal in this state by any person is received by that person when it is loaded into tank cars, tank trucks, tank wagons or other types of transportation equipment or when it is placed into any tank or other container from which sales or deliveries not involving transportation are made.
(1)(a) Motor fuel produced, refined, manufactured, blended or compounded by any person or stored at a pipeline terminal in this state by any person is received by that person when it is loaded into tank cars, tank trucks, tank wagons or other types of transportation equipment or when it is placed into any tank or other container from which sales or deliveries not involving transportation are made.

Motor fuel is received by a person other than the person designated in subsection (1)(a) of this section in the following circumstances:

Motor fuel delivered from a pipeline terminal in this state to a licensed distributor is received by the licensed distributor to whom it is first delivered.

Motor fuel delivered to a person who is not a licensed distributor for the account of a person that is so licensed, is received by the licensed distributor for whose account it is shipped.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) above, motor fuel shipped or delivered from a refinery or pipeline terminal to another refinery or pipeline terminal, is not received by reason of that shipment or delivery.

Any product other than motor fuel that is blended to produce motor fuel other than at a refinery or pipeline terminal in this state is received by the person who is the owner of the blended fuel after the blending is completed.

Motor fuel imported into this state, other than fuel placed in storage at a refinery or pipeline terminal in this state, is received at the time the fuel arrives in this state by the person who is, at the time of arrival, the owner of the fuel.
(4)(a) Motor fuel imported into this state, other than fuel placed in storage at a refinery or pipeline terminal in this state, is received at the time the fuel arrives in this state by the person who is, at the time of arrival, the owner of the fuel.

Motor fuel imported into this state by a licensed distributor and delivered directly to a person not a licensed distributor is received by the licensed distributor importing that fuel into this state at the time the fuel arrives in this state.

Fuel arrives in this state at the time it crosses the border of this state.

§ 63-2404. Method of measurement of gallons received.

Motor fuels and other petroleum products received by distributors shall be reported under rules prescribed by the state tax commission, and be based upon consistent methods, generally recognized and accepted for motor fuels tax accounting purposes, in respect to gallonage, stock transfers and stock accounting records.

§ 63-2405. Payment of tax.

The excise tax imposed by section 63-2402, Idaho Code, is to be paid by the distributor, and measured by the total number of gallons of motor fuel received by him, at the rate specified in section 63-2402, Idaho Code. That tax, together with any penalty and/or interest due, shall be remitted with the monthly distributor’s report required in section 63-2406, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2406. Distributor reports.

Each distributor shall, not later than the last day of each calendar month or for such other reporting period as the commission may authorize, render to the commission an accurate report of all motor fuel received by him in this state during the preceding reporting period. The report shall be made in the manner and on forms required by the commission.

The distributor’s report shall include:

An itemized statement of the total number of gallons of motor fuel received during the preceding calendar month; and

Other information as the commission may require for the proper administration of this chapter.

The report shall be accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due on the report together with any applicable interest and penalty, unless the amounts due are paid by electronic funds transfer in the manner provided by section 67-2026, Idaho Code.

Any distributor required to pay the tax imposed by this chapter who fails to pay such tax shall be liable to the commission for the amount of tax not remitted plus any applicable penalty or interest. The commission may collect such amounts in the manner provided in section 63-2434, Idaho Code.

The commission may prescribe rules providing standards consistent with section 63-115, Idaho Code, for determining which returns must be transmitted electronically. The commission may not require any person to transmit returns electronically unless such person is required to report on the return at least twenty-five (25) transactions involving the receipt or disbursement of motor fuel during the period to which the return relates. In promulgating such rules, the commission shall take into account, among other relevant factors, the ability of the taxpayer to comply, at a reasonable cost, with the requirements of such rules.

§ 63-2406A. Incentive for electronic filing of distributor’s reports and payment of taxes. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2407. Deductions authorized.

Each licensed distributor shall deduct from his monthly report:

Motor fuel exported from this state other than in the supply tanks of motor vehicles, motor boats or aircraft when supported by a shipping document, an invoice signed by the purchaser, or other proper documents approved by the commission but only if:

The purchaser is not a licensed distributor and the seller can establish that any tax due in the jurisdiction to which the motor fuel is destined is paid; or

The purchaser is a licensed distributor in the jurisdiction to which the motor fuel is destined.

Motor fuel returned to a licensed distributor’s refinery or pipeline terminal storage when supported by proper documents approved by the commission.

Motor fuel lost or destroyed by fire, lightning, flood, tornado, windstorm, explosion, or other accidental casualty, after presenting to the commission satisfactory proof of loss.

The number of gallons which would be equal to two percent (2%) of the total number of gallons received during the reporting period, less the total number of gallons deducted under subsections (1) through (3) of this section, which credit is granted to the licensed distributor to reimburse him for loss from evaporation, handling, spillage and shrinkage, except losses caused by casualty as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Motor fuel sold to the Idaho national guard for use in aircraft and in vehicles used off public highways provided, however, such deduction is supported by an exemption certificate signed by an authorized officer of the Idaho national guard.

§ 63-2408. Aircraft engine fuel tax.

An excise tax is hereby imposed on all aircraft engine fuel received in this state. The tax is to be paid by the distributor, and measured by the total number of gallons received by him, at the rate of seven cents (7¢) per gallon of aviation gasoline, and six cents (6¢) per gallon of jet fuel. The tax, together with any penalty and/or interest due, shall be remitted with the monthly distributor’s report required in section 63-2406, Idaho Code.

For gasoline, other than aircraft engine fuel, used in aircraft engines, the refund of gasoline tax provided in section 63-2410, Idaho Code, shall be the amount of gasoline tax paid less the aviation gasoline fuel tax required in this section.

A tax is hereby imposed on fuel which is placed into the fuel supply tank of aircraft in this state on which tax is not collected under subsection (1) of this section, the tax shall be payable at the rate established in subsection (1) of this section, to the commission by the user or consumer of the fuels and shall be a debt owing to the state until it is paid. The tax shall be imposed without regard to whether the fuel is used in the performance of a government contract.

§ 63-2409. License of distributors. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2410. Refund of gasoline tax procedure.

Any person who purchases fifty (50) gallons or more, and uses the gasoline in motor vehicles operated on highways outside of the state of Idaho where a duplicate tax is assessed for the same gasoline, will be entitled to a refund when a claim is presented to the commission in the manner required in subsection (5)(c) of this section. A claimant shall present to the commission a statement accompanied by a verification of the use determined by an audit of his operations conducted as prescribed by the state tax commission; or his claim may be verified by the filing of a receipt or proof showing the payment of tax on the gasoline used in any other state.

Any person who purchases within any one (1) year fifty (50) gallons or more of gasoline used for the purposes described in this subsection shall be entitled to be refunded the amount of gasoline tax previously paid on that gasoline. Exempt uses are:

Operating stationary gasoline engines;

Propelling equipment or vehicles that are not licensed or required to be licensed for operation on a highway;

Operating commercial motor boats; and

Propelling an all-terrain vehicle that is not required to be registered pursuant to chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, or chapter 71, title 67, Idaho Code.

No refund of gasoline tax shall be allowed for any gasoline that is:

Used in motor vehicles required to be licensed or used in any motor vehicle exempt from registration by reason of the ownership or residence;

Aircraft engine fuel placed in aircraft, provided however, if tax has been paid at the rate provided in section 63-2405, Idaho Code, on any motor fuel placed in the fuel supply tank of an aircraft, the user of the fuel may apply for a refund of the difference between the tax paid on the fuel and the tax imposed in section 63-2408, Idaho Code;

Used in recreational vehicles except all-terrain vehicles exempted as provided in subsection (2)(d) of this section; or

Used in noncommercial motor boats or in boats operated by a governmental entity.

Any licensed distributor paying the gasoline tax and/or aircraft engine fuel tax to the state of Idaho erroneously shall be allowed a credit or refund of the amount of tax paid by him if a written claim for credit or refund is filed with the commission within three (3) years after the date those taxes were paid. Such credit or refund shall include interest at the rate established in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, computed from the date taxes to be refunded or credited were paid to the commission.

All claims for refund of gasoline taxes arising under subsection (1), (2) or (3)(b) of this section may be filed separately or in conjunction with the claimant’s income tax return due pursuant to chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code. When filed in conjunction with the income tax return, the refund will be a refundable credit to income tax. The gasoline tax refund claimed must be for tax paid on gasoline actually purchased during the taxable year to which the income tax return relates. The gasoline tax refund due will be offset against any other taxes, penalties or interest due before any balance is refunded by the commission to the claimant. Subject to a limitation as to the amount of refund to be claimed as the commission may provide by rule, refund claims may be submitted and paid for any period not greater than one (1) year or less than one (1) month.
(b) If a claimant is not required to file an income tax return, the claimant will file claims using a filing cycle on forms and in the manner as the commission may provide. The refund claim must be for taxes paid on gasoline actually purchased in the year preceding the filing and the refund claim will be due according to income tax payment requirements in section 63-3085, Idaho Code. Refund claims may be submitted and paid for any period not greater than one (1) year or less than one (1) month.
(5)(a) All claims for refund of gasoline taxes arising under subsection (1), (2) or (3)(b) of this section may be filed separately or in conjunction with the claimant’s income tax return due pursuant to chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code. When filed in conjunction with the income tax return, the refund will be a refundable credit to income tax. The gasoline tax refund claimed must be for tax paid on gasoline actually purchased during the taxable year to which the income tax return relates. The gasoline tax refund due will be offset against any other taxes, penalties or interest due before any balance is refunded by the commission to the claimant. Subject to a limitation as to the amount of refund to be claimed as the commission may provide by rule, refund claims may be submitted and paid for any period not greater than one (1) year or less than one (1) month.
(b) If a claimant is not required to file an income tax return, the claimant will file claims using a filing cycle on forms and in the manner as the commission may provide. The refund claim must be for taxes paid on gasoline actually purchased in the year preceding the filing and the refund claim will be due according to income tax payment requirements in section 63-3085, Idaho Code. Refund claims may be submitted and paid for any period not greater than one (1) year or less than one (1) month.

Should the commission find that the claim contains errors, it may correct the claim and approve it as corrected, or the commission may require the claimant to file an amended claim. The commission may require any person who makes a claim for refund to furnish a statement under oath, giving his occupation, description of the machine or equipment in which the gasoline was used, the place where used and any other information as the commission may require. If the commission determines that any claim has been fraudulently presented, or is supported by an invoice or invoices fraudulently made or altered, or that any statement in the claim or affidavit is willfully false and made for the purpose of misleading, the commission may reject the claim in full. If the claim is rejected, the commission may suspend the claimant’s right to any refund for purchases made during a period not to exceed one (1) year beginning with the date the rejected claim was filed, and it shall take all other action deemed appropriate.
(6)(a) Should the commission find that the claim contains errors, it may correct the claim and approve it as corrected, or the commission may require the claimant to file an amended claim. The commission may require any person who makes a claim for refund to furnish a statement under oath, giving his occupation, description of the machine or equipment in which the gasoline was used, the place where used and any other information as the commission may require. If the commission determines that any claim has been fraudulently presented, or is supported by an invoice or invoices fraudulently made or altered, or that any statement in the claim or affidavit is willfully false and made for the purpose of misleading, the commission may reject the claim in full. If the claim is rejected, the commission may suspend the claimant’s right to any refund for purchases made during a period not to exceed one (1) year beginning with the date the rejected claim was filed, and it shall take all other action deemed appropriate.

The commission has authority, in order to establish the validity of any claim, to examine the books and records of the claimant for that purpose, and failure of the claimant to accede to the demand for the examination may constitute a waiver of all rights to the refund claimed.

In the event of the loss or destruction of the original invoice or invoices, the person claiming a refund may submit a duplicate copy of the invoice certified by the vendor, but payment based on the duplicate invoice shall not be made until one (1) year after the date on which the gasoline was purchased.

(c) Claims for refunds under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be filed in the manner prescribed in section 63-3072, Idaho Code. Such credit or refund shall include interest at the rate established in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, computed from sixty (60) days following the later of the due date of the claimed refund under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection or the filing of the claim. No refund will be paid under this section unless a written claim for such refund has been filed with the commission within three (3) years after the due date, including extensions, of the income tax return in regard to which the claim relates or the due date of the claim established in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

(d) The commission may require that all claims be accompanied by the original signed invoice or invoices issued to the claimant, showing the total amount of gasoline on which a refund is claimed and the reason, the amount of the tax and any additional information required by the commission. Each separate delivery shall constitute a purchase and a separate invoice shall be prepared, at least in duplicate, to cover the delivery. All invoices, except those prepared by a computer or similar machine, shall be prepared in ink, or double-spaced carbon shall be used between the original and first duplicate.

§ 63-2411. Purchase of motor fuel by retail dealers. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 63-2450.

§ 63-2412. Distribution of tax revenues from tax on gasoline and aircraft engine fuel.

The revenues received from the taxes imposed by sections 63-2402 and 63-2421, Idaho Code, upon the receipt or use of gasoline, and any penalties, interest, or deficiency additions, shall be distributed periodically as follows:

An amount of money equal to the actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing the gasoline tax requirements by the commission, as determined by it shall be retained by the commission. The amount retained by the commission shall not exceed the amount authorized to be expended by appropriation by the legislature. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing the gasoline tax requirements by the commission at the end of each fiscal year shall be distributed as listed in paragraph (f) of this subsection.

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission to be paid shall be paid from the state refund account and those moneys are hereby continuously appropriated for that purpose.

As soon as possible after the beginning of each fiscal year, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be distributed to the railroad grade crossing protection account [fund] in the dedicated fund, to pay the amounts from the account pursuant to the provisions of section 62-304C, Idaho Code.

As soon as possible after the beginning of each fiscal year, the sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) shall be distributed to the local bridge inspection account in the dedicated fund, to pay the amounts from the account pursuant to the provisions of section 40-703, Idaho Code.

An amount of money equal to seven percent (7%) shall be distributed to the state highway account established in section 40-702, Idaho Code.

From the balance remaining with the commission after distributing the amounts in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection:

One and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed as follows: sixty-six percent (66%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to the waterways improvement fund, as created in chapter 15, title 57, Idaho Code. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the moneys distributed to the waterways improvement account under the provisions of this paragraph may be used by the department of parks and recreation to defray administrative costs. Any moneys unused at the end of the fiscal year by the department of parks and recreation shall be returned to the state treasurer for deposit in the waterways improvement account. Thirty-three percent (33%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed into the park and recreation capital improvement account as created in section 57-1801, Idaho Code. One percent (1%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to the search and rescue fund created in section 67-2913, Idaho Code;

One and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed as follows: sixty-six percent (66%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to the off-road motor vehicle account, as created in section 57-1901, Idaho Code. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the moneys distributed to the off-road motor vehicle account by this subparagraph may be used by the department of parks and recreation to defray administrative costs. Any moneys unused at the end of the fiscal year by the department of parks and recreation shall be returned to the state treasurer for deposit in the off-road motor vehicle account. Thirty-three percent (33%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed into the park and recreation capital improvement account as created in section 57-1801, Idaho Code. One percent (1%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to the search and rescue fund created in section 67-2913, Idaho Code; and
3. Forty-four hundredths percent (.44%) shall be distributed to the park and recreation capital improvement account as created in section 57-1801, Idaho Code, to be used solely to develop, construct, maintain and repair roads, bridges and parking areas within and leading to parks and recreation areas of the state.

Provided however, the distribution pursuant to subsection (1) of this section of revenues received from the taxes imposed pursuant to section 63-2402(2), Idaho Code, shall apply only to twenty-five cents (25¢) of every thirty-two cents (32¢) received. The remaining seven cents (7¢) of every thirty-two cents (32¢) received pursuant to the provisions of section 63-2402(2), Idaho Code, shall be distributed as follows:

Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account; and

Forty percent (40%) to be distributed pursuant to the provisions of section 40-709, Idaho Code, in the same manner as distribution of moneys appropriated from the highway distribution account to local units of government.

The revenues received from the taxes imposed by section 63-2408, Idaho Code, and any penalties, interest, and deficiency amounts, shall be distributed as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission to be paid shall be paid from the state refund account, and those moneys are hereby continuously appropriated.

The balance remaining of all the taxes collected shall be distributed to the state aeronautics fund, as provided in section 21-211, Idaho Code.

4. The balance remaining shall be distributed to the highway distribution account created in section 40-701, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2413 — 63-2415. [Reserved.]

§ 63-2416. Tax imposed. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2417. Use tax imposed. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2418. Distribution of tax revenues from tax on special fuels.

Unless as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, revenues received from the tax imposed by this chapter upon the receipt of special fuel and any penalties, interest or deficiency additions, or from the fees imposed by the commission under the provisions of section 63-2424 or 63-2438, Idaho Code, shall be distributed as follows:

An amount of money equal to the actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing the special fuels tax provisions by the commission, as determined by it shall be retained by the commission. The amount retained by the commission shall not exceed the amount authorized to be expended by appropriation by the legislature. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing the special fuels tax requirements by the commission at the end of each fiscal year shall be distributed to the highway distribution account.

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission to be paid under this chapter shall be paid from the state refund account, those moneys being hereby continuously appropriated.

An amount of money equal to seven percent (7%) shall be distributed to the state highway account as established in section 40-702, Idaho Code.

The balance remaining with the commission after distributing the amounts specified in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be distributed to the highway distribution account established in section 40-701, Idaho Code.

For those special fuels subject to tax pursuant to section 63-2402 or 63-2424, Idaho Code, twenty-five cents (25¢) of every thirty-two cents (32¢) of revenue received from such tax shall be distributed pursuant to the provisions of subsections (1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section. The remaining seven cents (7¢) of every thirty-two cents (32¢) of revenue received shall be distributed as follows:

Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account; and

Forty percent (40%) to be distributed pursuant to the provisions of section 40-709, Idaho Code, in the same manner as distribution of moneys appropriated from the highway distribution account to local units of government.

§ 63-2419. Special fuels dealers’ licenses. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2420. Returns, payments and deductions by special fuels dealers. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2421. Use tax — Returns and payment of use tax by consumers.

For the privilege of using the highways of this state, any person, including a person described in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 63-2427A, Idaho Code, who consumes motor fuels in a motor vehicle licensed or required to be licensed by the laws of this state, or which is required to be licensed under the laws of another jurisdiction and is operated on the highways of this state upon which the tax imposed by section 63-2402, Idaho Code, has not been paid or is subject to credit or refund under IFTA and which fuel is not exempted from tax by this chapter, shall be liable for the tax.

Except for motor vehicles licensed under IFTA or operating with a temporary permit under section 49-432, Idaho Code, a person liable under subsection (1) of this section shall report the amount of tax liability and pay the taxes due in conjunction with his income or franchise tax return due under the provisions of chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, in the manner and form prescribed by the commission. Payment of motor fuels taxes shall be made in conjunction with any other taxes due on that return and motor fuels taxes due may be offset against refunds of any other taxes shown on the return to be due the taxpayer.

In the case of a person liable under subsection (1) of this section other than one who consumes motor fuels in a motor vehicle described in the exception in subsection (2) of this section and not required to file a return under chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, the tax shall be paid annually, on a calendar year basis, in the manner and form required by the commission. The return and payment for each calendar year shall be due on or before April 15 of the immediately succeeding calendar year.

In the case of a person liable under subsection (1) of this section whose motor vehicles are licensed or required to be licensed under IFTA as provided in sections 63-2438 and 63-2439, Idaho Code, or operating with a temporary permit under section 49-432, Idaho Code, the tax shall be paid in the manner required by those provisions.

§ 63-2422. Credits and refunds to dealers. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2423. Credits and refunds to consumers.

Any person who has paid his special fuels tax directly to the distributor from whom it was purchased shall be refunded the amount of:

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any special fuels tax paid on special fuels used for purposes other than operation or propulsion of motor vehicles upon the highways in the state of Idaho;

Any tax paid on special fuels used in motor vehicles owned or leased and operated by an instrumentality of the federal government or of the state of Idaho, including the state and all of its political subdivisions;

Any special fuels tax paid on special fuels exported for use outside the state of Idaho. Special fuels carried from the state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle will not be deemed to be exported from the state unless it is subject to a like or similar tax in the jurisdiction to which it is taken and that tax is actually paid to the other jurisdiction; and

Any tax, penalty or interest erroneously or illegally paid or collected.

No refund of special fuels tax shall be paid on:

Special fuels used in a recreational vehicle; or

Special fuels used in noncommercial motor boats or in motor boats operated by a governmental entity; or

Special fuels used while idling a registered motor vehicle, pursuant to the definition of “idling” as provided in section 63-2401, Idaho Code.

Refunds authorized in this section shall be claimed in the same manner as applies to refunds of gasoline tax under section 63-2410, Idaho Code, and shall be subject to interest computed pursuant to subsection (5) of that section.